Utah statutes.
9-9-208.   Limitations on state authority with respect to property and
rights of Indians.
Nothing in this chapter:
(1)  authorizes the alienation, encumbrance, or taxation of any real or
personal property, including water rights belonging to any Indian or any
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or
is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States;
(2)  authorizes the regulation of the use of this property in a manner
inconsistent with any federal treaty, agreement, or statute or with any
regulation made pursuant to them;
(3)  confers jurisdiction upon the state to adjudicate, in probate proceedings
or otherwise, the ownership or right to possession of this property or any
interest in it; or
(4)  enlarges, diminishes, or deprives any Indian or any Indian tribe, band,
or community of any right, privilege, or immunity afforded under federal
treaty, agreement, statute, or executive order with respect to Indian land
grants, hunting, trapping, or fishing or the control, licensing, or regulation
of these.
